California, session 20252026, AB431.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) If developed and deployed at scale, the development of advanced air mobility can provide economic and environmental benefits to the state and the nation.(b) The use of advanced air mobility can aid in California’s progress toward its statutory renewable energy and climate mandates.(c) Diversity in technologies lowers overall costs. Advanced air mobility technology adds diversity to the state’s transportation portfolio.(d) The development of advanced air mobility presents an opportunity to California by providing a tremendous opportunity for economic growth, including the development and preservation of a skilled and trained construction workforce to carry out projects and long-term job creation, all while improving mobility and accessibility for all Californians.(e) Advanced air mobility improves multimodal transportation and access to destinations by providing transportation opportunities that improve access to jobs, services, educational opportunities, and emergency and medical services.(f) Advanced air mobility will allow all Californians to traverse densely populated areas in a matter of minutes instead of hours, expanding accessibility while reducing traffic congestion on our roadways.(g) Investment in advanced air mobility can offer career pathways and workforce training in clean energy development. Advanced air mobility will provide additional blue collar industrial work opportunities and support apprenticeship opportunities for a diverse labor pool.SEC. 2. Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 21720) is added to Part 1 of Division 9 of the Public Utilities Code, to read: CHAPTER 9. Advanced Air Mobility Infrastructure Act21720. This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the “Advanced Air Mobility Infrastructure Act.”21721. For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:(a) “Advanced air mobility” means an air transportation system primarily using electric aircraft, including eVTOL and eCTOL aircraft, to carry passengers, cargo, or provide services in an urban or regional setting, with a gross takeoff weight of 300 pounds or more.(b) “eCTOL” means an electric conventional takeoff and landing aircraft. (c) “eVTOL” means an electric vertical takeoff and landing aircraft.(d) “Powered-lift aircraft” means the same as that term is defined in Part 1 (commencing with Section 1.1) of Subchapter A of Chapter I of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(e) “Vertiport” means an area of land, water, or a structure used or intended to be used for the landing or takeoff of powered-lift aircraft and includes associated buildings and facilities. 21722. This chapter only applies to electric aircraft, including eVTOL and eCTOL aircraft, and powered-lift aircraft that satisfy either of the following criteria: (a) Have a gross takeoff weight of 300 pounds or more.(b) Are capable of carrying humans or an equivalent amount of cargo.21723.The department shall do all of the following:(a)Develop a statewide plan, or update the statewide aviation plan, to include vertiports, electric aviation charging, and the infrastructure needs of other advances in aviation technology in the statewide aviation plan and as appropriate in the statewide work plan.(b)Designate a subject matter expert for advanced air mobility within the department as a resource for local and regional jurisdictions navigating advances in aviation technology, including electric powered-lift aircraft and electric aviation.(c)Lead a statewide education campaign for local and regional decisionmakers to educate them on the benefits of electric powered-lift aircraft and advancements in aviation technology.(d)Provide local and regional jurisdictions with guidance, including best practices, and technical resources to support uniform planning and zoning language across the state related to powered-lift aircraft, electric aviation, and other advances in aviation technology.21723. (a) The department, in coordination with the Transportation Agency, shall include advanced air mobility in the next update to the California Transportation Plan prepared after January 1, 2027.(b) The department, in coordination with the Transportation Agency, the Energy Commission, the State Air Resources Board, the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development, and the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation, shall establish a statewide working group to facilitate ongoing collaboration among state agencies, local offices of emergency management, and industry stakeholders to explore California’s role as a leader in the development and implementation of advanced air mobility, supporting technology, and economic development, including job creation.21724. (a) This chapter shall not be construed to interfere with or suspend either of the following:(1) The authority of the Federal Aviation Administration, or any other federal department or agency, including, but not limited to, federal authority related to the governance of federal airspace, air traffic control, and aviation safety, or any other federal regulations, laws, or policies governing the operation of airports or air transportation.(2) State zoning laws or regulations, including, but not limited to, zoning laws or regulations related to land use, development, or the construction of facilities within the jurisdiction of the local zoning authority.(b) This chapter shall not be construed to limit or interfere with the jurisdiction, authority, rights, or responsibilities of any airport sponsor or airport operator with respect to the operation, maintenance, management, or capital development of any airport within the state.SEC. 3.The Legislature finds and declares that Section 2 of this act adding Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 21720) to Part 1 of Division 9 of the Public Utilities Code addresses a matter of statewide concern rather than a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Section 2 of this act applies to all cities, including charter cities.SEC. 4.No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.